Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/kik_KE.aff
FLAG num
# Negation,All Noun Classes Subject, Assumed Object, Current Future/Past within the day -kũ
PFX 714 Y 208
PFX 714 0 ndikũ [bghmnr] 
PFX 714 a ndikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a ndikwe e[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ ndikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 o ndikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 ũ ndikũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 714 0 ndigũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a ndigwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 a ndigwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ ndigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o ndiguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 ũ ndigũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 714 0 tũtikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 714 0 tũtigũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a tũtikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a tũtigwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 e tũtikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 714 e tũtigwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 i tũtikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 714 i tũtigũi i[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ tũtikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ tũtigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o tũtikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 o tũtiguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 u tũtiku u[^ckt]
PFX 714 u tũtigu u[ckt]
PFX 714 0 ndũkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 714 0 ndũgũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a ndũkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a ndũgwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 e ndũkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 714 e ndũgwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 i ndũkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 714 i ndũgũi i[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ ndũkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ ndũgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o ndũkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 o ndũguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 u ndũku u[^ckt]
PFX 714 u ndũgu u[ckt]
PFX 714 0 mũtikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 714 0 mũtigũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a mũtikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a mũtigwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 e mũtikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 714 e mũtigwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 i mũtikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 714 i mũtigũi i[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ mũtikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ mũtigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o mũtikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 o mũtiguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 u mũtiku u[^ckt]
PFX 714 u mũtigu u[ckt]
PFX 714 0 ndakũ [bghmnr]
PFX 714 0 ndagũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a ndakwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a ndagwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 e ndakwa e[^ckt]
PFX 714 e ndagwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 i ndakũi i[^ckt]
PFX 714 i ndagũi i[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ ndakwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ ndagwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o ndakuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 o ndaguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 u ndaku u[^ckt]
PFX 714 u ndagu u[ckt]
PFX 714 0 matikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 714 0 matigũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a matikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a matigwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 e matikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 714 e matigwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 i matikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 714 i matigũi i[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ matikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ matigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o matikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 o matiguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 u matiku u[^ckt]
PFX 714 u matigu u[ckt]
PFX 714 0 ndĩkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 714 0 ndĩgũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a ndĩkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a ndĩgwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 e ndĩkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 714 e ndĩgwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 i ndĩkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 714 i ndĩgũi i[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ ndĩkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ ndĩgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o ndĩkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 o ndĩguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 u ndĩku u[^ckt]
PFX 714 u ndĩgu u[ckt]
PFX 714 0 rĩtikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 714 0 rĩtigũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a rĩtikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a rĩtigwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 e rĩtikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 714 e rĩtigwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 i rĩtikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 714 i rĩtigũi i[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ rĩtikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ rĩtigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o rĩtikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 o rĩtiguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 u rĩtiku u[^ckt]
PFX 714 u rĩtigu u[ckt]
PFX 714 0 gĩtikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 714 0 gĩtigũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a gĩtikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a gĩtigwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 e gĩtikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 714 e gĩtigwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 i gĩtikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 714 i gĩtigũi i[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ gĩtikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ gĩtigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o gĩtikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 o gĩtiguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 u gĩtiku u[^ckt]
PFX 714 u gĩtigu u[ckt]
PFX 714 0 citikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 714 0 citigũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a citikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a citigwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 e citikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 714 e citigwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 i citikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 714 i citigũi i[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ citikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ citigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o citikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 o citiguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 u citiku u[^ckt]
PFX 714 u citigu u[ckt]
PFX 714 0 itikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 714 0 itigũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a itikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a itigwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 e itikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 714 e itigwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 i itikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 714 i itigũi i[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ itikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ itigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o itikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 o itiguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 u itiku u[^ckt]
PFX 714 u itigu u[ckt]
PFX 714 0 rũtikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 714 0 rũtigũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a rũtikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a rũtigwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 e rũtikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 714 e rũtigwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 i rũtikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 714 i rũtigũi i[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ rũtikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ rũtigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o rũtikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 o rũtiguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 u rũtiku u[^ckt]
PFX 714 u rũtigu u[ckt]
PFX 714 0 gatikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 714 0 gatigũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a gatikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a gatigwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 e gatikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 714 e gatigwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 i gatikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 714 i gatigũi i[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ gatikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ gatigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o gatikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 o gatiguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 u gatiku u[^ckt]
PFX 714 u gatigu u[ckt]
PFX 714 0 gũtikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 714 0 gũtigũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a gũtikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a gũtigwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 e gũtikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 714 e gũtigwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 i gũtikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 714 i gũtigũi i[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ gũtikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ gũtigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o gũtikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 o gũtiguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 u gũtiku u[^ckt]
PFX 714 u gũtigu u[ckt]
PFX 714 0 hatikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 714 0 hatigũ [ckt]
PFX 714 a hatikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 714 a hatigwa a[ckt]
PFX 714 e hatikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 714 e hatigwe e[ckt]
PFX 714 i hatikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 714 i hatigũi i[ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ hatikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 714 ĩ hatigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 714 o hatikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 714 o hatiguo o[ckt]
PFX 714 u hatiku u[^ckt]
PFX 714 u hatigu u[ckt]

#Aspectual/Modal Suffixes, All verbs
SFX 480 Y 5
SFX 480 a aga [^i]a 
SFX 480 ia agia ia
SFX 480 wo agwo wo
SFX 480 a ire [^i]a
SFX 480 ia arie ia

#Aspectual/Modal Suffixes, Voiced Consonants
SFX 481 Y 3
SFX 481 a ĩĩte
SFX 481 ia ĩĩtie ia
SFX 481 wo ĩĩtwo wo

#Aspectual/Modal Suffixes, Voiced Consonants
SFX 482 Y 3
SFX 482 a ete [^i]a
SFX 482 ia etie ia
SFX 482 wo etwo wo

#Deverbal Extensions, All Verbs
SFX 450 Y 30
SFX 450 a anga [^i]a
SFX 450 a angwo [^i]a
SFX 450 wo angwo wo
SFX 450 ia angia ia
SFX 450 ia angio ia
SFX 450 a ana [^i]a
SFX 450 a anwo [^i]a
SFX 450 ia ania ia
SFX 450 ia anio ia
SFX 450 wo anwo wo
SFX 450 a ithia [^i]a
SFX 450 a ithio [^i]a
SFX 450 wo ithio wo
SFX 450 ia ithia ia
SFX 450 ia ithio ia
SFX 450 a ania [^i]a
SFX 450 ia ania ia
SFX 450 a anio [^i]a
SFX 450 ia anio ia
SFX 450 wo anio wo
SFX 450 a wo [^i]a
SFX 450 ia o ia
SFX 450 a anĩra [^i]a
SFX 450 a anĩrwo [^i]a
SFX 450 ia anĩria ia
SFX 450 ia anĩrio ia
SFX 450 a anĩria [^i]a
SFX 450 a anĩrio [^i]a
SFX 450 wo anĩrio wo
SFX 450 a ia [^i]a

# Deverbal Extensions, Verbs beginning with Voiced Consonants
SFX 451 Y 12
SFX 451 a ĩka [^i]a
SFX 451 ia ĩka ia
SFX 451 a ĩra [^i]a
SFX 451 a ĩrwo [^i]a
SFX 451 ia ĩria ia
SFX 451 ia ĩrio ia
SFX 451 a ĩria [^i]a
SFX 451 a ĩrio [^i]a
SFX 451 a ĩrĩra [^i]a
SFX 451 a ĩrĩrwo [^i]a
SFX 451 ia ĩrĩria ia
SFX 451 ia ĩrĩrio ia

# Deverbal Extensions, Verbs beginning with Voiceless Consonants
SFX 452 Y 12
SFX 452 a eka [^i]a
SFX 452 ia eka ia
SFX 452 a era [^i]a
SFX 452 a erwo [^i]a
SFX 452 ia eria ia
SFX 452 ia erio ia
SFX 452 a eria [^i]a
SFX 452 a erio [^i]a
SFX 452 a erera [^i]a
SFX 452 a ererwo [^i]a
SFX 452 ia ereria ia
SFX 452 ia ererio ia
