Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/kik_KE.dic
acũhia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
iya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
karia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
koma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
koroka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
kunga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kururia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kũga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
maatha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
mena/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
minja/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
naana/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ng'ea/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
niina/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
nyarara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
nyua/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
orora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
rara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
reka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
riga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
riita/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
roota/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
rura/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rĩithia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rũmĩrĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tagana/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tamũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
teithia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tema/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
tereba/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thaaka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thakara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
theeca/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thema/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
therũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thikĩrĩria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thinga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thira/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thithina/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thoga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thoma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thua/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thuria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thĩna/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thũa/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thũũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tihia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tithia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
toca/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
tonya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
tua/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tumia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tunga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
turũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tuĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tũgĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tũĩria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
uma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
una/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũkĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũmba/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũmbũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũnũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
